Mississippi, session 2026, HB929.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. (1)  There is created a study committee for the purpose of studying the funding and full payment of health insurance for all certified law enforcement officers, firefighters and other first responders who have attained the age of retirement under the rules and regulations of the Public Employees' Retirement System, and for any other related purpose.  The committee shall be comprised of the following nine (9) members: (a)  The President of the Mississippi Law Enforcement Officers Association, or his or her designee; (b)  The President of the Mississippi Sheriffs Association, or his or her designee; (c)  The President of the Mississippi Association of Chiefs of Police, or his or her designee; (d)  The President of the Mississippi Fire Chiefs Association, or his or her designee; (e)  The President of the Mississippi Firefighters Association, or his or her designee; (f)  One (1) member of the Senate, appointed by the Lieutenant Governor; (g)  One (1) member of the House of Representatives, appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives; (h)  One (1) member from the Mississippi Department of Finance and Administration, appointed by the Governor; and (i)  One (1) member who currently serves on the Board of Trustees for the Mississippi Public Employees' Retirement System, appointed by the chair of that board. (2)  Appointments to the study committee shall be made within thirty (30) days of the effective date of this act.  At the first meeting, the committee shall elect from among its membership a chair, a vice chair and any other officers determined to be necessary, and shall adopt rules for transacting business and keeping records. (3)  A majority of the members of the study committee shall constitute a quorum.  In the adoption of rules, resolutions and reports, and in the election of a chair, vice chair and any other officers determined to be necessary, an affirmative vote of a majority of the members present shall be required. (4)  The Joint Legislative Committee on Performance Evaluation and Expenditure Review (PEER) shall provide the staff and other support necessary for the study committee to perform its duties. (5)  To effectuate the purposes of this act, any department, division, board, bureau, committee, institution or agency of the state, or any political subdivision thereof, shall, at the request of the chair of the study committee, provide the facilities, assistance, information and data needed to enable the study committee to carry out its duties. (6)  The study committee shall be dissolved on or before January 1, 2027. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.